test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VV_gookookohoo_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfs
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NA - VV - gookookohoo :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     gookookohoo: gookookohoo
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+gookookohoo: nigookookohoo
     2+gookookohoo: gigookookohoo
     3+gookookohoo: ogookookohoo
     X+gookookohoo: igookookohoo
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     gookookohoo+NA+Con: gookookohoonh
     gookookohoo+NA+Dim: gookookohoons
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     gookookohoo+NA+Pej: gookookohoosh
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     gookookohoo+NA+Pret: gookookohooban
     gookookohoo+NA+VocPl: [gookookohoodig, gookookohoodog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     gookookohoo+NA+Loc: gookookohoong
     gookookohoo+NA+Obv: gookookohoon
     gookookohoo+NA+Pl: gookookohoog
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con: nigookookohoonh
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim: nigookookohoons
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con: gigookookohoonh
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim: gigookookohoons
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con: ogookookohoonh
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim: ogookookohoons
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Con: igookookohoonh
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Dim: igookookohoons
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos: nigookookohoom
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos: gigookookohoom
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos: ogookookohoom
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos: igookookohoom
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej: nigookookohoosh
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej: gigookookohoosh
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej: ogookookohoosh
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pej: igookookohoosh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+gookookohoo+NA+1Pl: nigookookohoonaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+21: gigookookohoonaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+2Pl: gigookookohoowaa
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3Obv: ogookookohooni
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3Pl: ogookookohoowaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pret: nigookookohooban
     1+gookookohoo+NA+VocPl: [nigookookohoodig, nigookookohoodog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pret: gigookookohooban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+VocPl: [gigookookohoodig, gigookookohoodog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pret: ogookookohooban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+VocPl: [ogookookohoodig, ogookookohoodog]
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pret: igookookohooban
     X+gookookohoo+NA+VocPl: [igookookohoodig, igookookohoodog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Loc: nigookookohoong
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Obv: nigookookohoon
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pl: nigookookohoog
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Loc: gigookookohoong
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Obv: gigookookohoon
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pl: gigookookohoog
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Loc: ogookookohoong
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Obv: ogookookohoon
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pl: ogookookohoog
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Loc: igookookohoong
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Obv: igookookohoon
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pl: igookookohoog
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pej: gookookohoonyish
     gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pej: gookookohoonsish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pret: gookookohoonyiban
     gookookohoo+NA+Con+VocPl: [gookookohoonyidig, gookookohoonyidog]
     gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pret: gookookohoonsiban
     gookookohoo+NA+Dim+VocPl: [gookookohoonsidig, gookookohoonsidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     gookookohoo+NA+Con+Loc: gookookohoonying
     gookookohoo+NA+Con+Obv: gookookohoonyin
     gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pl: gookookohoonyig
     gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Loc: gookookohoonsing
     gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Obv: gookookohoonsan
     gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pl: gookookohoonsag
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Pret: gookookohooshiban
     gookookohoo+NA+Pej+VocPl: [gookookohooshidig, gookookohooshidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Loc: gookookohooshing
     gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Obv: gookookohooshan
     gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Pl: gookookohooshag
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     gookookohoo+NA+Pret+Loc: gookookohoobaniing
     gookookohoo+NA+Pret+Obv: gookookohoobaniin
     gookookohoo+NA+Pret+Pl: gookookohoobaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos: nigookookohoonyim
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos: nigookookohoonsim
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos: gigookookohoonyim
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos: gigookookohoonsim
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos: ogookookohoonyim
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos: ogookookohoonsim
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos: igookookohoonyim
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos: igookookohoonsim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pej: nigookookohoonyish
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pej: nigookookohoonsish
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pej: gigookookohoonyish
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pej: gigookookohoonsish
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pej: ogookookohoonyish
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pej: ogookookohoonsish
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pej: igookookohoonyish
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pej: igookookohoonsish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+1Pl: nigookookohoonyinaan
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+1Pl: nigookookohoonsinaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+21: gigookookohoonyinaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+2Pl: gigookookohoonyiwaa
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+21: gigookookohoonsinaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+2Pl: gigookookohoonsiwaa
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3Obv: ogookookohoonyini
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3Pl: ogookookohoonyiwaa
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3Obv: ogookookohoonsini
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3Pl: ogookookohoonsiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pret: nigookookohoonyiban
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+VocPl: [nigookookohoonyidig, nigookookohoonyidog]
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pret: nigookookohoonsiban
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+VocPl: [nigookookohoonsidig, nigookookohoonsidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pret: gigookookohoonyiban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+VocPl: [gigookookohoonyidig, gigookookohoonyidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pret: gigookookohoonsiban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+VocPl: [gigookookohoonsidig, gigookookohoonsidog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pret: ogookookohoonyiban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+VocPl: [ogookookohoonyidig, ogookookohoonyidog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pret: ogookookohoonsiban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+VocPl: [ogookookohoonsidig, ogookookohoonsidog]
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pret: igookookohoonyiban
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Con+VocPl: [igookookohoonyidig, igookookohoonyidog]
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pret: igookookohoonsiban
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+VocPl: [igookookohoonsidig, igookookohoonsidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Loc: nigookookohoonying
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Obv: nigookookohoonyin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pl: nigookookohoonyig
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Loc: nigookookohoonsing
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Obv: nigookookohoonsan
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pl: nigookookohoonsag
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Loc: gigookookohoonying
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Obv: gigookookohoonyin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pl: gigookookohoonyig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Loc: gigookookohoonsing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Obv: gigookookohoonsan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pl: gigookookohoonsag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Loc: ogookookohoonying
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Obv: ogookookohoonyin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pl: ogookookohoonyig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Loc: ogookookohoonsing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Obv: ogookookohoonsan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pl: ogookookohoonsag
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Loc: igookookohoonying
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Obv: igookookohoonyin
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pl: igookookohoonyig
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Loc: igookookohoonsing
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Obv: igookookohoonsan
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pl: igookookohoonsag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej: nigookookohoomish
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej: gigookookohoomish
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej: ogookookohoomish
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej: igookookohoomish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1Pl: nigookookohoominaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+21: gigookookohoominaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+2Pl: gigookookohoomiwaa
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3Obv: ogookookohoomini
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3Pl: ogookookohoomiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pret: nigookookohoomiban
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+VocPl: [nigookookohoomidig, nigookookohoomidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pret: gigookookohoomiban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+VocPl: [gigookookohoomidig, gigookookohoomidog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pret: ogookookohoomiban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+VocPl: [ogookookohoomidig, ogookookohoomidog]
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pret: igookookohoomiban
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+VocPl: [igookookohoomidig, igookookohoomidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Loc: nigookookohooming
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Obv: nigookookohooman
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pl: nigookookohoomag
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Loc: gigookookohooming
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Obv: gigookookohooman
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pl: gigookookohoomag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Loc: ogookookohooming
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Obv: ogookookohooman
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pl: ogookookohoomag
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Loc: igookookohooming
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Obv: igookookohooman
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pl: igookookohoomag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1Pl: nigookookohooshinaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+21: gigookookohooshinaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+2Pl: gigookookohooshiwaa
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3Obv: ogookookohooshini
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3Pl: ogookookohooshiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Pret: nigookookohooshiban
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+VocPl: [nigookookohooshidig, nigookookohooshidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Pret: gigookookohooshiban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+VocPl: [gigookookohooshidig, gigookookohooshidog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Pret: ogookookohooshiban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+VocPl: [ogookookohooshidig, ogookookohooshidog]
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Pret: igookookohooshiban
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+VocPl: [igookookohooshidig, igookookohooshidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Loc: nigookookohooshing
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Obv: nigookookohooshan
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Pl: nigookookohooshag
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Loc: gigookookohooshing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Obv: gigookookohooshan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Pl: gigookookohooshag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Loc: ogookookohooshing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Obv: ogookookohooshan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Pl: ogookookohooshag
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Loc: igookookohooshing
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Obv: igookookohooshan
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Pl: igookookohooshag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     1+gookookohoo+NA+1Pl+Pret: nigookookohoonaaniban
     1+gookookohoo+NA+1Pl+VocPl: [nigookookohoonaanidig, nigookookohoonaanidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+21+Pret: gigookookohoonaaniban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+21+VocPl: [gigookookohoonaanidig, gigookookohoonaanidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+2Pl+Pret: gigookookohoowaaban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+2Pl+VocPl: [gigookookohoowaadig, gigookookohoowaadog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3Obv+Pret: ogookookohooniiban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3Obv+VocPl: [ogookookohooniidig, ogookookohooniidog]
